Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 6. Virginia Passenger Rail Authority Act.
§ 33.2-294.
Issuance of bonds.

The Authority may issue bonds from time to time in its discretion, for any of its purposes, including the payment of all or any part of the cost of rail facilities. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any bonds issued to pay for the initial funding of capital projects shall be limited to financing capital expenditures and projects submitted for approval by the Transportation Board as set forth in §

33.2-298

.

The Authority may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding that shall have been issued under the provisions of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date fixed for redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the Authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this article insofar as the same may be applicable.

The bonds of each issue shall be dated such date as may be determined by the Authority; shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be fixed by the Authority, or as may be determined in such manner as the Authority may provide, including the determination by agents designated by the Authority under guidelines established by the Authority; shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 40 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Authority; and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority prior to the issuance of the bonds.

The Authority shall determine the form of the bonds and manner of execution of the bonds and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or outside the Commonwealth. The bonds shall be signed by the chairman or vice-chairman of the Authority or, if so authorized by the Authority, shall bear his facsimile signature and the official seal of the Authority, or, if so authorized by the Authority, a facsimile thereof shall be impressed or imprinted thereon and attested by the secretary or any assistant secretary of the Authority, or, if so authorized by the Authority, with the facsimile signature of such secretary or assistant secretary. Any coupons attached to bonds issued by the Authority shall bear the signature of the chairman or vice-chairman of the Authority or a facsimile thereof. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery, and any bonds may bear the facsimile signature of, or may be signed by, such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be the proper officers to sign such bonds although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been such officers.

The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. Bonds issued in registered form may be issued under a system of book-entry for recording the ownership and transfer of ownership of rights to receive payment of principal of, and premium on, if any, and interest on such bonds. The Authority may contract for the services of one or more banks, trust companies, financial institutions, or other entities or persons, within or outside the Commonwealth, for the authentication, registration, transfer, exchange, and payment of the bonds or may provide such services itself. The Authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this article.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes, and in furtherance of the powers, of the Authority as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same.

In addition to the above powers, the Authority shall have the authority to issue interim receipts or temporary bonds as provided in §

15.2-2616

and to execute and deliver new bonds in place of bonds mutilated, lost, or destroyed as provided in §

15.2-2621

.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be payable solely from funds available pursuant to the provisions of this article, and no liability shall be incurred by the Authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided or received under the provisions of this article.

At the discretion of the Authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this article may be secured by a trust indenture or agreement by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the Commonwealth. Such trust indenture or agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received and provide for the mortgage of any rail facilities or property or any part thereof. Such trust indenture or agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants providing for the repossession and sale by the Authority or any trustees under any trust indenture or agreement of any rail facilities, or part thereof, upon any default under the lease or sale of such rail facilities, setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the planning, development, acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, establishment, improvement, extension, enlargement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the rail facilities in connection with which such bonds shall have been authorized; the amounts of rates, rents, fees, and other charges to be charged; the collection of such rates, rents, fees, and other charges; the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It is lawful for any national bank with its main office in the Commonwealth or any other state or any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth or another state that may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such trust indenture or agreement or resolution may set forth the rights of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust indenture or agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders, including, without limitation, provisions for the assignment to a corporate trustee or escrow agent of any rights of the Authority in any project owned by, or leases or sales of any rail facilities made by, the Authority. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust indenture or agreement or resolution or other agreements relating to any rail facilities, including those to which the Authority may not be a party, may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the rail facilities.

No obligation of the Authority shall be deemed to constitute a debt, or pledge of the faith and credit, of the Commonwealth or of any other political subdivision thereof but shall be payable solely from the revenues and other funds of the Authority pledged thereto, excluding revenues provided from the Commonwealth Rail Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1526.4

. All such obligations shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Commonwealth, any political subdivision thereof, and the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues and other funds of the Authority pledged thereto, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligations.

Any bonds or refunding bonds issued under the provisions of this article and any transfer of such bonds shall at all times be free from Commonwealth and local taxation. The interest on the bonds and any refunding bonds or bond anticipation notes shall at all times be exempt from taxation by the Commonwealth and by any political subdivision thereof.

Neither the directors of the Board nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this article or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust indenture or agreement or resolution, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust indenture or agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted hereunder or under such trust indenture or agreement or resolution and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this article or by such trust indenture or agreement or resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, rentals, fees, and other charges.

Provision may be made in the proceedings authorizing refunding bonds for the purchase of the refunded bonds in the open market or pursuant to tenders made from time to time where there is available in the escrow or sinking fund for the payment of the refunded bonds a surplus in an amount to be fixed in such proceedings.

The Authority is hereby authorized to apply for, execute, and/or endorse applications submitted by private entities or political subdivisions of the Commonwealth to obtain federal credit assistance for one or more qualifying transportation infrastructure projects or facilities to be developed pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.). Any such application, agreement, and/or endorsement shall not financially obligate the Commonwealth or be construed to implicate the credit of the Commonwealth as security for any such federal credit assistance.
O. 1. The Authority is hereby authorized to apply for, execute, and/or endorse applications submitted by private entities or political subdivisions of the Commonwealth to obtain federal credit assistance for one or more qualifying transportation infrastructure projects or facilities to be developed pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.). Any such application, agreement, and/or endorsement shall not financially obligate the Commonwealth or be construed to implicate the credit of the Commonwealth as security for any such federal credit assistance.

The Authority is hereby authorized to pursue or otherwise apply for, and execute, an agreement to obtain financing using a federal credit instrument for project financings otherwise authorized by this article or other acts of assembly.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-295.
Deposit and investment of funds.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, and all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-296.
Revenues of the Authority.

All moneys received by the Authority pursuant to this article including, without limitation, moneys received from the Commonwealth Rail Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.4

, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust indenture or agreement or resolution securing such bonds shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as a trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this article and such trust indenture or agreement or resolution may provide.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-297.
Moneys of Authority.

All moneys of the Authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the Authority. Such moneys shall be deposited in the first instance by the treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, in one or more special accounts. All banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits, if required by the Authority. The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on the warrant or other order of such person or persons as the Authority may authorize to execute such warrants or orders.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-298.
Annual budget.

The Authority shall prepare and submit a detailed annual operating plan and budget to the Transportation Board by February 1 of each fiscal year. The Authority shall also prepare and submit for approval any proposed capital expenditures and projects for the following fiscal year to the Transportation Board by February 1. The Transportation Board shall have until May 30 to approve or deny any capital expenditures, and, in the event the Transportation Board has not approved or denied the Authority’s proposed capital expenditures by such deadline, such expenditures shall be deemed approved. The operating plan and budget shall be in a form prescribed by the Transportation Board and shall include information on expenditures, indebtedness, and other information as prescribed by the Transportation Board.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.
Recordkeeping; audits.

The accounts and records of the Authority showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in a form prescribed by governmental generally accepted accounting principles. Such accounts shall correspond as nearly as possible to the accounts and records for such matters maintained by enterprises.

The accounts of the Authority shall be audited annually by a certified public accounting firm selected by the Auditor of Public Accounts with the assistance of the Authority through a process of competitive negotiation. The cost of such audit and review shall be borne by the Authority.

The Authority shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before November 1 of each year. Such report shall contain the audited financial statements of the Authority for the fiscal year ending the preceding June 30.

The Board, the General Assembly, or the Governor may at any time request that the Office of the State Inspector General, created pursuant to §

2.2-308

, review any area of the Authority’s finances or operations.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.1.
Exemption of Authority from personnel and procurement procedures.

The provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) and the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this article. The Authority shall develop and adopt rules governing their procurement procedures. However, such rules adopted for the procurement of professional services with a cost expected to exceed $80,000 shall be consistent with the provisions of §§

2.2-4302.2

,

2.2-4303.1

and

2.2-4303.2

. The initial rules shall be adopted by the Board no later than six months after the first meeting of the Board.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.2.
Police powers; Authority rules and regulations.

The Authority is empowered to adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations governing any and all activities using Authority property. Such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law after publication one time in full in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the affected property is located.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.3.
Governmental function; exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this article will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of rail facilities by the Authority and the undertaking of activities in the furtherance of the purposes of the Authority will constitute the performance of the essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any rail facilities or any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this article or upon the income therefrom, including sales and use taxes on the tangible personal property used in the operations of the Authority. The exemption hereby granted shall not be construed to extend to persons conducting on the premises of any rail facility businesses for which local or state taxes would otherwise be required.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.4.
Cooperation with federal agencies.

The Authority is empowered to cooperate with, and act as an agent for, the United States or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof in the maintenance, development, improvement, and use of rail facilities of the Commonwealth and in any other matter within the purposes, duties, and powers of the Authority.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.5.
Continuing responsibilities of the Transportation Board and the Department.

The Transportation Board and the Department shall cooperate and assist the Authority in the accomplishment of its purposes as set forth in §

33.2-288

.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.6.
Dissolution of Authority.

Whenever the Board determines that the purposes for which it was created have been substantially fulfilled or are impractical or impossible to accomplish and that all bonds theretofore issued and all other obligations therefore incurred by the Authority have been paid or that cash or a sufficient amount of United States government securities has been deposited for their payment, and upon the approval of the Governor and the General Assembly, the Board may adopt resolutions or ordinances declaring and finding that the Authority should be dissolved and that appropriate articles of dissolution shall be filed with the State Corporation Commission. Upon the filing of such articles of dissolution by the Authority, such dissolution shall become effective and the title to all funds and other property owned by the Authority at the time of such filing shall vest in the Department.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.7.
Exclusions from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act; proprietary records and trade secrets.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), the Authority shall keep confidential trade secrets or confidential proprietary information, not publicly available, provided by a private person or entity pursuant to a promise of confidentiality where if such information were made public, the financial interest of the private person or entity could be adversely affected. In order for trade secrets or proprietary information to be excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, the private person or entity shall (i) invoke such exclusion upon submission of the data or other materials for which protection from disclosure is sought, (ii) identify the data or other materials for which protection is sought, and (iii) state the reason why protection is necessary.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, the Authority shall keep confidential information submitted by a private person, entity, or other party in negotiations with the Authority, where if such information was made public prior to the execution of a business arrangement, the financial interests of bargaining positions of the public or private entity would be adversely affected.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-299.8.
Liberal construction.

Neither this article nor anything herein contained is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that the Authority might otherwise have under any laws of the Commonwealth, and this article is cumulative to any such powers. This article does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to power conferred by other laws. However, except as otherwise explicitly provided herein, the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations and refunding bonds under the provisions of this article need not comply with the requirements of any other law of the Commonwealth applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations. No proceedings, notice, or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes, and other obligations or any instrument as security therefor, except as is provided in this article.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.